Massachusetts, session 194th, H590.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8A of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 33 after the word "resuscitation" the
following:- the administration of epi-pens.
SECTION 2. Section 54B of chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following two paragraphs:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, each school
shall, subject to appropriation, maintain a stock supply of non-patient specific epinephrine
available to all students, including students with individualized health care plans prescribing
epinephrine injections, to be administered in the event of an anaphylactic emergency. The
department of public health shall promulgate regulations requiring school districts to adopt and
implement policies pursuant to this section. Such regulations shall require that stock epinephrine
be stored in an easily accessible unlocked location, the number and type of epinephrine auto
of 2

injectors required be based on school population, that the individuals authorized to administer
epinephrine meet certain training requirements for such administration, including the use of
epinephrine dose calculation devices, and that the stock inventory be checked at regular intervals
for expiration and replacement. A school nurse or other authorized individual who provides,
administers, or assists in the administration of epinephrine to a student believed in good faith to
be having an anaphylactic reaction shall not be liable for any civil damages for negligence in acts
or omissions resulting from the rendering of such treatment. Whenever any employee of a school
district is covered by the immunity granted herein, the school district employing the individual
shall not be liable for any civil damages for negligence in acts or omissions resulting from the
rendering of such treatment.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the cost of supplying non-
patient specific epinephrine to schools pursuant to this section shall be assessed on surcharge
payors as defined by section 64 of chapter 118E and may be collected in a manner consistent
with said chapter 118. All surcharge revenue generated under this section shall be collected in a
manner consistent with said chapter and department of public health regulation.
of 2